Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 4-120, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 357, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 4-120), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4-120. A. The registration of any registered voter
shall be canceled only for one of the following reasons:
1. Written notice from the voter pursuant to Section 4-120.1 of
this title;
2. Death;
3. Conviction of a felony;
4. Judicial determination of mental incapacitation under Title
30 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Registration in another county or state;
6. Failure to respond to a confirmation of address mailing and
failure to vote as prescribed in Section 4-120.2 of this title;
7. The surrendering of the voter’s Oklahoma driver license to
Service Oklahoma upon being issued a driver license in another
state; or
8. Being excused from jury duty for not being a citizen of the
United States; or
9. Determination that the voter is not a citizen of the United
States.
B. For purposes of this section, paragraphs 5 and 7 of
subsection A of this section shall constitute confirmation from the
voter to cancel his or her voter registration due to a change of
residence.
C. A list of voter registrations that were canceled during the
previous twenty-four (24) months, and the reason for the
cancellation, shall be made available to the public.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1086 Page 2

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-122 of Title 26, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Secretary of the State Election Board may compare the
list of registered voters in this state with the database of any
federal, state, or local agency, board, or commission that maintains
information regarding the citizenship of persons residing in this
state.
B. If a registered voter definitively matches a person who is
recorded in a database described in subsection A of this section as
not being a citizen of the United States, the Secretary or his or
her designee shall send a notice of such finding to the voter. The
voter shall, within thirty (30) days from the date the notice is
sent to the voter, present proof of citizenship to the secretary of
the county election board in the county where the voter is
registered. Voters may present legible copies of qualifying
documents in person or by mail, electronic mail, or any other secure
method approved by the Secretary.
C. If a voter fails to present proof of citizenship within the
prescribed time to the county election board or otherwise provides
notice that the voter is not a citizen, then the voter’s
registration shall be canceled, and the voter shall be reported to
the appropriate district attorney and United States attorney.
D. For purposes of this section, “proof of citizenship” shall
mean any citizenship-confirming document that meets the minimum
standards of the REAL ID Act of 2005, Public Law No. 109-13, Section
202(c).
E. The Secretary shall promulgate rules and procedures as
necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 7-103.2, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 264, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 7-103.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 7-103.2. A. 1. County election boards shall maintain
a current list of all registered voters in each precinct, which will
reflect the address and party affiliation of each voter. The list
ENR. S. B. NO. 1086 Page 3

shall be public information subject to the requirements described in
subsection B of this section.
2. The list shall only be shared with a court system if that
court system agrees to regularly provide the names of persons
convicted of a felony in that court system to the Secretary of the
State Election Board and the appropriate secretary of a county
election board, or if the court system is required by state law to
provide such information.
3. The list shall note any voter for whom a first-class mailing
from the county election board or the State Election Board was
returned undeliverable.
B. 1. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall ensure
that an electronic copy of the voter registration list described in
subsection A of this section is made available to the public, free
of charge, to the following:
a. bona fide residents of this state who are citizens of
the United States,
b. official representatives of political parties
recognized by the laws of this state,
c. candidates for office in this state and their official
representatives, or
d. other persons authorized by state law.
2. Any person accessing the voter registration list shall be
required to complete an application form approved by the Secretary
that shall include:
a. the legal name, address of residence in this state,
telephone number, and electronic mail address of the
person,
b. an attestation under penalty of perjury that the
person meets the legal requirements to access the
list, and
ENR. S. B. NO. 1086 Page 4

c. any additional information deemed necessary by the
Secretary.
3. It shall be unlawful for the recipient of a voter
registration list to use such list for any commercial marketing or
advertising purposes. Provided, for the purposes of this section, a
commercial purpose shall not include the use of the voter list by
campaigns, political parties, government officials, or public
opinion pollsters to contact or interact with voters.
4. It shall be unlawful for the recipient of a voter
registration list to knowingly make the list available or provide
such list to a foreign national, foreign commercial interest, or
foreign government entity.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1086 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1086 Page 6